Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1740
Sections; supplementary to existing law.

Sections 14-1731 to 14-1740 are supplementary to existing statutes relating to cities of the metropolitan class and confer upon such cities powers not heretofore granted.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 10.